Washington statutes.
RCW 38.16.040

State guard reserve.

In order to afford the utmost protection to the state of Washington and to the lives and property of citizens thereof, in times of emergency or anticipation thereof, the governor, through the state military department may provide for the organization and training of state guard reserve companies in communities not allocated a federally recognized or authorized state guard unit.

[ 1943 c 130 s 86; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-86.]